Tennessee, session 114, HB0642.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 57-1-209(b), is amended by deleting
the language "March 1" and substituting instead "February 15".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0642
001735
- 1 -